Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2,186
Articles of dissolution.

(MBCA 14.03) (a) At any time
after dissolution is authorized, the corporation may dissolve by delivering
to the Secretary of State for filing articles of dissolution setting forth:

(1) The name of the corporation;

(2) The date dissolution
was authorized; and

(3)
If dissolution was approved by the shareholders, a statement that the proposal
to dissolve was duly approved by the shareholders in the manner required by
the Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act and by the articles of incorporation.

(b) A corporation is dissolved
upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

(c) For purposes of sections
21-2,184 to 21-2,192, dissolved corporation means a corporation whose articles
of dissolution have become effective and includes a successor entity to which
the remaining assets of the corporation are transferred subject to its liabilities
for purposes of liquidation.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 186.